California statutes. Insurance Code
 in excess of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000), whether in United States dollars or the equivalent of United States dollars, as of the close of its most recently completed fiscal year; or is able to demonstrate to the satisfaction of the commissioner that it is financially secure. The commissioner may consider, among other factors, evidence of the following in order to determine whether a qualified foreign subcustodian is financially secure for purposes of this subdivision: (i) its obligations are guaranteed by its parent company, (ii) its parent holding company has shareholder equity of at least two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000), or (iii) it is a member of a holding company system with shareholder equity of at least two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000).

(4) As used in this section, “subsidiary” means: (A) an entity all of whose voting securities (other than director qualifying shares, if any) are owned, directly or
 indirectly, by a qualified custodian; or (B) any affiliated entity approved by the commissioner as a subsidiary of a qualified custodian. For the purpose of this section, an affiliated entity means an entity that (A) controls or is controlled, either directly or indirectly or through one or more intermediaries, by a qualified custodian or (B) is under the common control, directly or indirectly, as or with a qualified custodian.

(5) As used in this section, “entity approved by the commissioner as a qualified custodian,” “entity approved by the commissioner as a qualified depository,” “entity approved by the commissioner as a qualified subcustodian,” and “entity approved by the commissioner as a subsidiary of a qualified custodian” mean those entities that meet the conditions or standards established by the commissioner. The commissioner shall charge and collect in advance a one-time fee of two thousand two hundred forty-one dollars ($2,241) to
 review an application for approval of any entity pursuant to this section.

(6) As used in this section, “reciprocal state” has the same meaning as in subdivision (f) of Section 1064.1.

(7) As used in this section, “moneys” means cash held incidental to securities transactions occurring in the ordinary course of business with respect to securities held pursuant to the custodial agreements under this section.

(8) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), as used in this section, “insurer,” “domestic insurer,” and “domestic admitted insurer” mean any insurer, other than a domestic life insurer that is incorporated or that has its principal place of business in this state. Except as provided in subparagraph (B), no portion of this section applies to domestic life insurers nor shall this section
 affect the interpretation of any other portion of this code with respect to domestic life insurers nor is it intended to create a precedent for the application of its provisions to those insurers. However, the exclusion of domestic life insurers from this section shall not be construed to diminish the commissioner’s existing authority over those insurers under any other provision of this code.

(B) Domestic life insurers that are wholly owned by any insurer other than a domestic life insurer or are part of an insurance holding company system whose other insurer affiliates are not domestic life insurers may elect to be subject to this section by affirmatively stating that election in the statement otherwise required to be filed by that system pursuant to Section 1215.4.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 1104.1, a domestic admitted insurer may maintain its securities and moneys in a
 reciprocal state, subject to the requirements of this section, through a custodian account located in California in or with a qualified custodian, and that qualified custodian may maintain those securities or moneys in a qualified depository or qualified subcustodian, either or both of which may be located in a reciprocal state. In addition, a domestic insurer that has foreign investments or any other investments that require delivery outside of the United States upon sale or maturity that qualify under Section 1240, 1241, or 10506, or any other provision of this code, may maintain those securities or moneys in or with a qualified depository located in a jurisdiction outside the United States. However, the aggregate amount of general account investments so deposited shall not exceed the lesser of 5 percent of the total admitted assets of the insurer or 25 percent of the excess of admitted assets over the sum of paid-up capital, liabilities, and surplus required by Section 700.02. However, unless exempted by
 the commissioner, not more than 50 percent of that amount of assets that an insurer is authorized to invest pursuant to Section 1241 or 1241.1 may be maintained in any single country in a qualified depository as defined in clause (ii) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) and as to life companies not more than 12.5 percent of that amount of assets that an insurer is authorized to invest pursuant to Section 1241 or 1241.1 may be maintained in any single country in a qualified depository as defined in clause (ii) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). The percentage or dollar value of admitted assets and paid-up capital and liabilities shall be determined by the insurer’s last preceding annual statement of conditions and affairs made as of the preceding December 31 that has been filed with the commissioner pursuant to law. A broker or agent, as defined in the Federal Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 78c et seq.), may not serve as a qualified custodian, qualified subcustodian, or qualified depository
 under this section. However, no otherwise qualified custodian or subcustodian shall be disqualified on account of its activities as a broker or dealer, as so defined, when the activities are incidental to its custodial or other business.

(c) Securities shall not be deposited in or with a qualified custodian, qualified depository, or qualified subcustodian except as authorized by an agreement between the insurer and the qualified custodian, if the agreement is satisfactory to and has been approved by the commissioner. The agreement shall require that the securities be held by the qualified custodian for the benefit of the insurer and that the books and records of the qualified custodian shall so designate. The agreement shall further require that beneficial title to the securities remain in the insurer and shall require that the qualified subcustodian and qualified depository be the agents of the qualified custodian. The agreement shall also
 specifically require that the qualified custodian shall exercise the standard of care of a professional custodian engaged in the banking or trust company industry and having professional expertise in financial and securities processing transactions and custody would observe in these affairs. This section does not affect the burden of proof under applicable law with respect to the assertion of liability in any claim, action, or dispute alleging any breach of, or failure to observe, that standard of care.

(d) An agreement between the qualified custodian and the insurer shall not be approved by the commissioner unless the qualified custodian agrees therein to comply with this section. Except when the agreement is submitted in conjunction with an application for an original certificate of authority or variable life and variable annuity qualification, a fee of seven hundred forty-eight dollars ($748) shall be paid to the commissioner at the time of
 filing the agreement for approval. However, a fee shall not be required if the form of the agreement has been previously submitted for approval and approved by the commissioner as certified by the insurer and qualified custodian submitting the agreement to the commissioner. The agreement shall be deemed approved unless, within 60 days after receipt by the commissioner of that agreement and any required filing fee, the commissioner has disapproved the agreement in writing citing specific reasons for disapproval.

(e) Notwithstanding the maintenance of securities with an out-of-state qualified depository or qualified subcustodian pursuant to agreement, if the commissioner has reasonable cause to believe that the domestic insurer (1) is conducting its business and affairs in a manner as to threaten to render it insolvent, or (2) is in a hazardous condition or is conducting its business and affairs in a manner that is hazardous to its policyholders,
 creditors, or the public, or (3) has committed or is committing or has engaged or is engaging in any act that would constitute grounds for rendering it subject to conservation or liquidation proceedings, or if the commissioner determines that irreparable loss and injury to the property and business of the domestic insurer has occurred or may occur unless the commissioner acts immediately, then the commissioner may, without hearing, order the insurer and the qualified custodian promptly to effect the transfer of the securities back to a qualified custodian, qualified subcustodian, or qualified depository located in this state from any qualified depository or qualified subcustodian located outside of this state (the transfer order). Upon receipt of the transfer order, the qualified custodian shall promptly effect the return of the securities. Notwithstanding the pendency of any hearing or action provided for in subdivision (f), the transfer order shall be complied with by those persons subject to that order.
 Any challenge to the validity of the transfer order shall be made in accordance with subdivision (f). It is the responsibility of both the insurer and the qualified custodian to oversee that compliance with the transfer order is completed as expeditiously as possible. Upon receipt of a transfer order, there shall be no trading of the securities without specific instructions from the commissioner until the securities are received in this state, except to the extent trading transactions are in process on the day the transfer order is received by the insurer and the failure to complete the trade may result in loss to the insurer’s account. Issuance of a transfer order does not affect the qualified custodian’s liabilities with regard to the securities that are the subject of the order.

(f) At the same time the transfer order is served, the commissioner shall issue and also serve upon the insurer a notice of hearing to be held at a time and place
 fixed therein which shall not be less than 20 nor more than 45 days after the service thereof. Upon request of the insurer and agreement of the department, the hearing may be held within a shorter time but in no event less than 10 days after the service of the notice of hearing. The transfer order and notice of hearing may be served by certified mail, express mail, messenger, telegram, or any other means calculated to give prompt actual notice to (1) the California office of the insurer designated in the agreement, its home office as shown on its most recently filed annual or quarterly statement, or its California agent for service of process; and (2) the California office of the qualified custodian designated in the agreement. If, as a result of the hearing, any of the statements as to conduct, conditions, or grounds for the transfer order are found to be true, or if other conditions or grounds are discovered or become known at the hearing and are found to be true, the commissioner shall affirm the transfer
 order and may make additional order or orders, pertaining to the transfer order, as may be reasonably necessary.

The insurer subject to the transfer order is entitled to judicial review in the state of the commissioner’s order issued as a result of the hearing.

Alternatively, at any time prior to the commencement of the hearing on the transfer order, the insurer may waive the hearing and have judicial review in this state of the transfer order by petition for writ of mandate and declaratory relief without first exhausting administrative remedies or procedures. In that event the insurer is not entitled to any extraordinary remedies prior to trial.

No person other than the insurer has standing at the hearing by the commissioner or for any judicial review of the transfer order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 184, Sec. 5.   (SB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1105.

This article shall not prevent:

(a) The purchase by any person of any asset which the commissioner requires to be sold, at a price approved by the commissioner.

(b) The borrowing in accordance with its terms by any person upon a policy of life insurance upon his own life.

(c) The payment of a fee to any attorney for legal services rendered to any such insurer.

(d) The receipt of advances under agency contracts by agents of life insurers. 

(e) Any admitted insurer’s officers, directors, trustees or other persons who have authority in the management of the funds of such insurer from entering into any transaction with such insurer if:

(1) Such transaction is pursuant to a permit issued by the Insurance Commissioner under authority granted to him by other provisions of this code or is such as requires his approval prior to its consummation under other provisions of this code;

(2) The application for any such permit or the request for any such approval sets forth under oath the complete details concerning all such transactions with any such officers, directors, trustees or other persons; and

(3) Where the commissioner in his permit or approval specifically finds that the consummation of such transaction will not be unfair, unjust or inequitable to such insurer or to any of its stockholders or policyholders.

(f) Any transaction between an insurer and a person having authority in the management of the insurer’s funds (except officers, directors, and trustees), if such insurer is subject to registration and reporting under the Insurance Holding Company System Regulatory Act (Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 1215) of Chapter 2 of this part), or subject to substantially similar registration and reporting requirements under the laws of its domicile.

(g) An admitted insurer making a loan for the purchase of a principal residence by, and acquiring, at a price not to exceed the fair market value thereof, the principal residence from, an officer or person having authority in management of the insurer’s funds, nor shall such officer or person be prohibited from accepting such loan or acquisition, in connection with the relocation of the place of employment at the request of the insurer, either during the course of employment or upon initial employment of such officer or person having authority in management of the insurer’s funds.

Any loan permitted under this subdivision shall be secured by a first trust deed or first mortgage, shall not exceed 90 percent of the fair market value of the property, shall carry an interest rate no more favorable than that rate given to other employees of such insurer not subject to the limitations of this article and shall be subject to the approval of the insurer’s board of directors or delegated committee thereof.

This subdivision shall not apply to directors and trustees of insurers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 812, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1106.

Any person violating, or wilfully aiding another in the violation of, Sections 1101, 1101.1, 1102, 1103, 1104 or the commissioner’s order issued pursuant to Section 1104.1 is guilty of a misdemeanor. The commissioner shall, after a hearing upon due notice, revoke, or deny the renewal of, the certificate of authority of a domestic admitted insurer persisting for more than 60 days from and after the commissioner’s order issued pursuant to Section 1104.1 in failure to comply with such order. The proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and the commissioner shall have the powers granted therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 592.)
-------------------------------------------

1107.

In accordance with either subdivision (e) of Section 1001 or Section 1101.1 of the Corporations Code, an insurer may apply for the insurance commissioner’s approval of the terms and conditions of the covered transactions and the fairness of such terms and conditions to deliver consideration other than securities which shall be in such form, contain such information and be accompanied by such documents as the commissioner deems appropriate or requires.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 795.)
-------------------------------------------

1107.1.

The commissioner shall require the payment of three hundred seventy-four dollars ($374), as fee for the determination referred to in Section 1107.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 23.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 18. Multiple Insurer Operations [1110. - 1113.]

1110.

This article does not apply to combination automobile insurance policies in which one insurer issues a policy covering certain classes of insurance on a risk, and another insurer covers certain other classes of insurance on the same risk. This article applies to:

(a) The issuance of a policy in which more than one insurer indemnifies the insured severally, jointly, or jointly and severally with other insurers for all or a specified portion of a risk.

(b) The issuance of a policy which is subject to an automatic reinsurance agreement under which several insurers participate with the insurer or insurers issuing the policy to the same extent as though they were primary insurers, and the contract is negotiated upon the basis of such reinsurance and the policy makes reference to the fact of such reinsurance.

(c) Policies issued pursuant to a plan providing for the allocation among various insurers of risks who have been unable to procure such insurance without resort to the plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 872.)
-------------------------------------------

1111.

Insurers desiring to issue policies to which this article is applicable, and to pay commissions to persons who are licensed as insurance agents, but not as agents for all insurers participating in the risk, and who are not licensed as insurance brokers, may file with the commissioner in such form as he may require, a statement of the plan under which they intend to operate, and a list of the insurers that will operate under the plan. If the commissioner finds that the nature of the plan is not such that the interests of the insuring public will be jeopardized by permitting an agent of one or more of the insurers to act in a transaction with or for all the insurers, or for the particular insurer paying the commission without being licensed as agent for such insurer or as an insurance broker, he may issue a permit authorizing the operation of the plan by or on behalf of the insurers listed in the application, and the payment of commissions pursuant to the plan as approved by the commissioner shall be lawful.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 872.)
-------------------------------------------

1112.

Within 10 days after the withdrawal of an insurer from the plan or from the time additional insurers participate in the plan, notice of the change shall be given the commissioner in writing, and unless such notice is so given, the permit theretofore issued by the commissioner shall expire on the tenth day after such change. Unless the permit expires as provided in the preceding sentence, it shall remain in force continuously unless the commissioner after hearing finds that the insurers have deviated materially from the plan, and that it is against public interest to continue its operation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 872.)
-------------------------------------------

1113.

For filing application for a permit issued pursuant to this article, the commissioner shall charge and collect the sum of one hundred seven dollars ($107).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 24.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Incorporated Insurers [1140. - 1260.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [1140. - 1142.]

1140.

Except as otherwise provided in this code, incorporated insurers are subject to the provisions of the general corporation law in like manner with other corporations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1140.1.

(a) A domestic incorporated life insurer may be organized under the Nonprofit Mutual Benefit Corporation Law. With the prior consent of the commissioner, an existing domestic incorporated life insurer organized under the general corporation law may be converted to a domestic incorporated life insurer under the Nonprofit Mutual Benefit Corporation Law pursuant to Section 911 of the Corporations Code. The consent shall be obtained by filing an application accompanied by any information that the commissioner may require, and by submitting a filing fee of seven thousand dollars ($7,000).

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this code, a domestic incorporated life insurer organized under the Nonprofit Mutual Benefit Corporation Law shall be subject to that law in the same manner as other corporations organized under that law. In the case of a conflict between the Insurance Code and the Nonprofit Mutual Benefit Corporation Law, the provisions of the Insurance Code shall prevail.

(c) A life insurer organized under the Nonprofit Mutual Benefit Corporation Law shall have the same powers held by, and shall be subject to all provisions of this code applicable to, a domestic incorporated stock life insurer, except for Section 1140. An insurer so organized shall have a surplus (in lieu of paid-in capital and surplus) at least equal to the sum of the paid-in capital and surplus required of a stock insurer admitted for the same classes. In addition, an insurer so organized shall be subject to the same premium tax obligations as a stock insurer.

(d) Officers, directors, and other managers of domestic life insurers organized under the Nonprofit Mutual Benefit Corporation Law shall not be entitled to any rights, preferences, or privileges that are not allowed for the officers, directors, or managers of an insurer of the same class organized under the general corporation law.

(e) For a life insurer organized under the Nonprofit Mutual Benefit Corporation Law, all references in this code to “shareholders” shall be interpreted to mean “members,” and all references to “shares,” “stocks,” or “securities” shall mean “memberships,” as defined in the Nonprofit Mutual Benefit Corporation Law.

(f) The issuance of memberships to policyholders that are not natural persons shall be subject to the provisions of Article 8 (commencing with Section 820) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1. A domestic incorporated life insurer organized under the Nonprofit Mutual Benefit Corporation Law shall have at least one member. The redemption of memberships, other than for policyholders that are not natural persons, shall be subject to the same rules as those applicable to the payment of dividends by a domestic incorporated stock life insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 376, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1140.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a copy of every form of proxy or written consent or authorization for use at any meeting or proceeding of shareholders or stockholders of any domestic insurer to evidence authority to cast the vote of any shareholder or stockholder, or to record the consent or the authorization of any shareholder or stockholder to any action of the insurer, and a copy of every solicitation, announcement, or advertisement used to obtain, or to influence any shareholder or stockholder to sign, any proxy, or written consent or authorization shall be filed with the commissioner, accompanied by a filing fee of one hundred thirty-six dollars ($136), by the person intending to use, issue, publish, or circulate the document. This document shall not be used, issued, published, or
 circulated before a period of 10 days following the date of its filing, or any shorter period that may be designated by the commissioner, has elapsed. Within the 10-day or a shorter period, the commissioner may disapprove of any document filed with him or her pursuant to this section, stating his or her reasons therefor in writing, in which case, the document shall not be used, issued, published, or circulated.

(b) Any person who fails to make the filing required by this section and who thereafter uses any document required to be filed, uses the document before it has been filed with the commissioner for the period required, or uses the document after receiving written notice that the document has been disapproved by the commissioner is guilty of a misdemeanor. It shall be unlawful to use any proxy or consent obtained in violation of this section. The superior court of the State of California in and for the county in which is located the
 principal place of business of the insurer shall have jurisdiction to enforce this section and the regulations promulgated pursuant to this section, and to grant appropriate relief upon the verified petition of the commissioner, the domestic insurer, or any of its shareholders or stockholders.

(c) The purposes of this section are: to ensure that the shareholders, stockholders, or other persons entitled to vote or give written consents or authorizations are provided with adequate and accurate information regarding the affairs of the insurers in which they have interests, the interests of those soliciting proxies or written consents or authorizations and of those upon whose behalf the solicitations are made, and the matters as to which proxies, written consents, or authorizations are solicited; and to prevent fraud or deception in connection with proxies, proxy statements, or other proxy solicitations. The commissioner may make rules and
 regulations in furtherance of the purposes of this section. These rules and regulations may differ as to different classes and types of insurers.

(d) This section shall not apply to any domestic insurer having fewer than 100 shareholders or stockholders and shall not apply to any domestic insurer if 95 percent or more of its stock is owned or controlled by a parent or an affiliated insurer and the remaining shares of stock are owned by fewer than 500 shareholders or stockholders. Any domestic insurer that files with the federal Securities and Exchange Commission forms of proxies, consents, and authorizations complying with the requirements of the federal Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 78a et seq.) and the amendments thereto and the applicable regulations thereunder, is exempt from this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 25.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1141.

No director, trustee, officer or agent of any insurer shall be subject to personal liability by reason of any payment or any determination not to contest or seek recovery of any payment made subsequent to June 4, 1944, or hereafter made, by or on behalf of such insurer on account of any tax, license, fee, deposit or other charge paid pursuant to the terms of any statute, law or ordinance of this or any other State, county, city or taxing authority, unless prior to such payment or determination such statute, law or ordinance shall have been judicially rendered invalid by action of the State court having final appellate jurisdiction in the premises or by action of the Supreme Court of the United States. This section is applicable not only to directors, trustees, officers and agents of insurers generally but also to reciprocal or interinsurance exchanges, members of their subscribers’ boards, their attorneys in fact and any director, trustee, officer and agent thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 27.)
-------------------------------------------

1142.

In situations of hardship, financial embarrassment or where other good cause is shown the commissioner may, in his discretion, by written order, permit an insurer to acquire by gift, devise, bequest or other transfer an asset, or a part thereof, not otherwise permissible, or retain an asset, however obtained. Such order, or any amendments thereto, shall specify the asset and the mode of acquisition or retention which is to be permitted and shall specify such reasonable time as the commissioner may determine in his discretion for the retention, or further retention of such asset. At the end of such time or earlier if he determines circumstances warrant such action the commissioner may invoke the procedure of Section 1202 for the purpose of requiring the insurer to dispose of the asset, or a part thereof, so acquired or held.

This section shall not apply to any asset of an insurer which:

(1) Has been held for 25 years or more, and

(2) Consists entirely of corporate securities, and

(3) The value does not exceed more than one-tenth of 1 percent of the total assets of the insurer.

The insurer may retain such an asset.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1547.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Restrictions on Activities [1152. - 1155.]

1152.

(a) Domestic incorporated stock insurers, except those governed by Sections 10530, 12373, and 12640.06, shall be governed by the provisions of this section and, if the insurer is subject to registration pursuant to Sections 1215.4 and 1215.5, as to payment or distribution of dividends to stockholders. Such insurers may make dividends only from earned surplus.

(b) No dividends shall be declared out of earned surplus derived from the mere net appreciation in the value of assets not yet realized, nor shall any dividends be declared from any part of such earned surplus derived from an exchange of assets, unless and until such earned surplus have been realized or unless the assets received are currently realizable in cash.

(c) An insurer may declare and distribute a dividend otherwise prohibited by this section if (1) following payment of the dividend the insurer’s surplus as regards policyholders is (A) reasonable in relation to its outstanding liabilities and (B) adequate to its financial needs as prescribed in Section 1215.5, and (2) the commissioner has given approval for the dividend prior to payment.

(d) For purposes of this section, “earned surplus” means unassigned funds, as required to be reported on the insurer’s annual statement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 974, Sec. 1.8.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1153.

An insurer shall not be admitted within three years from and after the time when it commences business as an insurer, nor within three years from and after the time when it is first incorporated, unless assets equal to the sum of its liabilities and the minimum capital and surplus required for admission are maintained in cash or one or more of the following:

(a) Securities specified in Sections 1170 to 1175, inclusive. 

(b) Premiums that are in the course of collection, or agents’ balances representing premiums, on policies effected not more than 90 days prior to the date on which these premiums or balances are valued for the purpose of this section, and earned service fees receivable, not over 90 days due, and evidences of debt representing those assets.

(c) In the case of a life insurer, the amount of current deferred premiums receivable, after deducting therefrom the amount of the loading.

(d) Interest accrued and dividends declared, receivable on any of the assets specified in subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, no part of which interest or dividends has been due in excess of one year. 

(e) Amount of reinsurance recoverable from admitted insurers.

(f) With the prior approval of the commissioner, any investments authorized by this code if the following conditions are met:

(1) The insurer has previously been authorized to write life or health insurance, or is seeking authority to write life or health insurance.

(2) The solvency of the insurer is guaranteed by another insurer (the “guaranteeing insurer”) that meets the following criteria:

(A) The guaranteeing insurer has an ownership interest of at least 50 percent in the insurer.

(B) The guaranteeing insurer, which may be a reciprocal or interinsurance exchange, has been admitted to do business in this state for not less than 10 years.

(C) The guaranteeing insurer has maintained a surplus of admitted assets over all liabilities of at least five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) for not less than three years.

(3) The commissioner, in his or her discretion, determines that the proposed investment is sound in relation to the insurer’s business plan and operations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 495, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1153.5.

An admitted insurer which has been in business as an insurer less than three years from and after the time when it commenced business as an insurer shall maintain its assets during the balance of such three-year period in the types of assets specified in Section 1153, excepting such of its assets as are in excess of the sum of its liabilities and the surplus and capital requirements for admission. On its failure so to do, the commissioner may revoke its certificate of authority. The proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the commissioner shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 543.)
-------------------------------------------

1154.

After the period specified in Sections 1153 and 1153.5, the requirements of those sections shall no longer be applicable to any insurer specified therein and shall no longer affect or modify the application or nonapplication of any section of this code.

The provisions of Sections 1153 and 1153.5 shall not govern or limit the investments of any insurer formed by merger, consolidation, or reinsurance of the entire business of any one or more admitted insurers if any one or more of the merged, consolidated, reinsuring or reinsured insurers was, prior to such consolidation, merger, or reinsurance, admitted, or authorized to do business as an insurer in any state, for a period of three or more years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 339.)
-------------------------------------------

1155.

An insurer, within such limits as may be set by the board of directors, may contribute to community funds or to charitable, philanthropic, or benevolent instrumentalities conducive to public welfare or civic betterment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 564.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. General Investments [1170. - 1182.]

1170.

Domestic incorporated insurers may invest their assets in the purchase of any of the securities specified in this article, or in loans upon such securities, if those purchases or loans conform to all the following conditions:

(a) Such securities are not in default as to principal or interest at the date of investment.

(b) In the case of a purchase, the purchase price does not exceed the market value of the securities at the date of investment.

(c) In the case of a loan not governed by the provisions of Section 1194.81, the amount loaned does not exceed eighty-five per cent of such market value at the date of
 investment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 234, Sec. 7.   (AB 299)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1171.

Such insurers may invest in obligations of the United States or obligations for which the faith and credit of the United States are pledged for payment of principal and interest.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1171.5.

Such insurers may invest in obligations of the United States Postal Service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 464.)
-------------------------------------------

1172.

Such insurers may invest in obligations of the Dominion of Canada, or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or of any province of the Dominion of Canada, or of any political subdivision of the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or obligations for which are pledged the faith and credit either of the dominion, or the commonwealth, or of any province of the dominion, or of any political subdivision of the commonwealth, for the payment of principal and interest, if within 10 years immediately preceding the investment such province or such political subdivision was not in default for more than 90 days in the payment of principal or interest upon any legally authorized obligation issued by it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 476.)
-------------------------------------------

1173.

Such insurers may invest in obligations issued under authority of law by any county, municipality, or school district in this State or in any other state, or in any province of the Dominion of Canada or in any political subdivision of the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, if the obligor has not within two years next preceding the investment defaulted for more than 90 days in the payment of any part of either principal or interest upon any legally authorized obligation issued by it, and the obligations of the state or province or political subdivision in which it is located are legal for investment under the provisions of Sections 1172 or 1174.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 476.)
-------------------------------------------

1174.

Such insurers may invest in obligations of this State or those for which the faith and credit of this State are pledged for the payment of principal and interest, and in obligations of any other State in the United States, if within ten years immediately preceding the investment such State was not in default for more than ninety days in the payment of any part of principal or interest of any debt duly authorized by the Legislature of such State to be contracted by such State since the first day of January, 1878.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1937, Ch. 738.)
-------------------------------------------

1175.
